Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1424
Government body, defined.

Government body shall mean an authority, department, commission, committee, council, board, bureau, division, office, legislative body, or other agency in the executive, legislative, or judicial branch of state government or of one or more political subdivisions thereof or a school district, state college, state university, or other state-supported institution of higher education.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 24.